Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB727.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Notwithstanding KRS 141.020(2)(a)2., the appropriation contained
in this section is supported solely by funds from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account
established by KRS 48.705 and shall not be identified as a GF appropriation when
certifying the reduction conditions pursuant to KRS 141.020(2)(a)5. and (d)2. to 5.
There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $22,275,500 in
fiscal year 2024-2025 from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS
48.705 to the West Kentucky State Aid Funding for Emergencies (WKSAFE) Fund
established in KRS 39A.305.
Section 2. Notwithstanding KRS 39A.305(8) and (9), there is hereby
appropriated Restricted Funds from the West Kentucky State Aid Funding for
Emergencies (WKSAFE) Fund established in KRS 39A.305 in the amount of
$22,275,500 in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the Department for Local Government to be
distributed to the Graves County Fiscal Court to support the replacement of the Graves
County Jail.
Section 3. If the recipient of moneys from the WKSAFE Fund under Section 2
of this Act subsequently receives moneys from any other source, the recipient shall
reimburse the Commonwealth for the amount of the moneys received from the WKSAFE
Fund. All moneys reimbursed to the Commonwealth shall be deposited into the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund account established in KRS 48.705 within 30 days. The moneys
appropriated in Section 2 of this Act shall not lapse and shall carry forward until June 30,
2026. If the moneys are not encumbered by June 30, 2026, the moneys shall be returned
to the Commonwealth and shall be deposited into the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account established in KRS 48.705 within 30 days.
Section 4. Whereas the continuing recovery from the December 2021 storms
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1168
and tornadoes in the west Kentucky region is of utmost importance to the citizens within
that region, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage
and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:44 AM Jacketed